Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-808
Bookkeeper and clerk.

If the board determines that the best interests of the municipality and the patrons of the utility will be better or more economically served thereby, they may employ the duly elected city clerk as ex officio bookkeeper and collector for the utility or utilities, and he may be paid a reasonable salary for the extra services required of him in such position in addition to his salary as city clerk.

Laws 1935, c. 33, § 6, p. 140;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-706;

R.S.1943, § 17-808.